Hawaii statutes.
§149A-34 Denial, suspension, or revocation
of certificate. The department may deny issuance of a certificate for
reasonable cause. Any certificate issued pursuant to rules adopted under
section 149A-33(1) may be suspended or revoked by the department, after
hearing, for violation of any condition of the certificate or of any law or
rule pertaining to the use of any restricted use pesticide. Any order made by
the department for the suspension or revocation of a certificate shall be in
writing and shall set forth the reasons for the suspension or revocation. The
action of the department in suspending or revoking a certificate may be
reviewed in the manner provided by chapter 91. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L
1975, c 126, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 310, §18]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next